Mississippi statutes. Title 91. Trusts and Estates
Chapter 1. Descent and Distribution

§ 91-1-1.
What law to govern.

All personal property situated in this state shall descend and be distributed according to the laws of this state regulating the descent and distribution of such property, regardless of all marital rights which may have accrued in other states, and notwithstanding the domicile of the deceased may have been in another state, and whether the heirs or persons entitled to distribution be in this state or not. The widow of such deceased person shall take her share in the personal estate according to the laws of this state.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 60, art. 110; 1871, § 1950; 1880, § 1270; 1892, § 1542; 1906, § 1648; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1380; 1930, § 1401; 1942, § 467.

§ 91-1-3.
Descent of land.

When any person shall die seized of any estate of inheritance in lands, tenements, and hereditaments not devised, the same shall descend to his or her children, and their descendants, in equal parts, the descendants of the deceased child or grandchild to take the share of the deceased parent in equal parts among them. When there shall not be a child or children of the intestate nor descendants of such children, then to the brothers and sisters and father and mother of the intestate and the descendants of such brothers and sisters in equal parts, the descendants of a sister or brother of the intestate to have in equal parts among them their deceased parent’s share. If there shall not be a child or children of the intestate, or descendants of such children, or brothers or sisters, or descendants of them, or father or mother, then such estate shall descend, in equal parts, to the grandparents and uncles and aunts, if any there be; otherwise, such estate shall descend in equal parts to the next of kin of the intestate in equal degree, computing by the rules of the civil law. There shall not be any representation among collaterals, except among the descendants of the brothers and sisters of the intestate.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 44, art. 2 (50); 1857, ch. 60, art. 110; 1871, § 1948; 1880, § 1271; 1892, § 1543; 1906, § 1649; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1381; 1930, § 1402; 1942, § 468; Laws, 1952, ch. 252, § 1.

§ 91-1-5.
Half-bloods.

There shall not be, in any case, a distinction between the kindred of the whole and half-blood, except that the kindred of the whole-blood, in equal degree, shall be preferred to the kindred of the half-blood in the same degree.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 44, art. 2 (50); 1857, ch. 60, art. 110; 1871, § 1949; 1880, § 1271; 1892, § 1544; 1906, § 1650; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1382; 1930, § 1403; 1942, § 469.

§ 91-1-7.
Descent of property as between husband and wife.

If a husband die intestate and do not leave children or descendants of children, his widow shall be entitled to his entire estate, real and personal, in fee simple, after payment of his debts; but where the deceased husband shall leave a child or children by that or a former marriage, or descendants of such child or children, his widow shall have a child’s part of his estate, in either case in fee simple. If a married woman die owning any real or personal estate not disposed of, it shall descend to her husband and her children or their descendants if she have any surviving her, either by a former husband or by the surviving husband, in equal parts, according to the rules of descent. If she have children and there also be descendants of other children who have died before the mother, the descendants shall inherit the share to which the parent would have been entitled if living, as coheirs with the surviving children. If she have no children or descendants of them, then the husband shall inherit all of her property.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 44, art. 3, 4; 1857, ch. 17, art. 1; 1871, § 1788; 1880, § 1771; 1892, § 1545; 1906, § 1651; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1383; 1930, § 1404; 1942, § 470.

§ 91-1-9.
Descent of trust estates.

If any cestui que trust shall die leaving a trust in lands, tenements, or hereditaments in fee simple or in freehold, the trust shall descend as real estate if not disposed of by will, or if not inconsistent with the declaration of the trust.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 1272; 1892, § 1546; 1906, § 1652; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1384; 1930, § 1405; 1942, § 471.

§ 91-1-11.
Personal estate to descend as real estate.

When any person shall die possessed of goods and chattels or personal estate not bequeathed, the same shall descend to and be distributed among his or her heirs in the same manner that real estate not devised descends.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 44, art. 2 (52); 1857, ch. 60, art. 111; 1871, § 1951; 1880, § 1273; 1892, § 1547; 1906, § 1653; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1385; 1930, § 1406; 1942, § 472.

§ 91-1-13.
Estate of testator not disposed of by will to descend.

All estate, real and personal, not devised or bequeathed in the last will and testament of any person shall descend and be distributed in the same manner as the estate of an intestate; and the executor or administrator shall administer the same accordingly.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 60, art. 112; 1871, § 1952; 1880, § 1274; 1892, § 1548; 1906, § 1654; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1386; 1930, § 1407; 1942, § 473.

§ 91-1-15.
Descent among illegitimates; definitions.

The following terms shall have the meaning s ascribed to them herein:

“Remedy” means the right of an illegitimate to commence and maintain a judicial proceeding to enforce a claim to inherit property from the estate of the natural mother or father of such illegitimate, said claim having been heretofore prohibited by law, or prohibited by statutes requiring marriage between the natural parents, or restrained, or enjoined by the order or process of any court in this state.

“Claim” means the right to assert a demand on behalf of an illegitimate to inherit property, either personal or real, from the estate of the natural mother or father of such illegitimate.

“Illegitimate” means a person who at the time of his birth was born to natural parents not married to each other and said person was not legitimized by subsequent marriage of said parents or legitimized through a proper judicial proceeding.

“Natural parents” means the biological mother or father of the illegitimate.

An illegitimate shall inherit from and through the illegitimate’s mother and her kindred, and the mother of an illegitimate and her kindred shall inherit from and through the illegitimate according to the statutes of descent and distribution. However, if an illegitimate shall die unmarried and without issue, and shall also predecease the natural father, the natural mother or her kindred shall not inherit any part of the natural father’s estate from or through the illegitimate. In the event of the death of an illegitimate, unmarried and without issue, any part of the illegitimate’s estate inherited from the natural father shall be inherited according to the statutes of descent and distribution.

An illegitimate shall inherit from and through the illegitimate’s natural father and his kindred, and the natural father of an illegitimate and his kindred shall inherit from and through the illegitimate according to the statutes of descent and distribution if:

The natural parents participated in a marriage ceremony before the birth of the child, even though the marriage was subsequently declared null and void or dissolved by a court; or

There has been an adjudication of paternity or legitimacy before the death of the intestate; or

There has been an adjudication of paternity after the death of the intestate, based upon clear and convincing evidence, in an heirship proceeding under Sections 91-1-27 and 91-1-29. However, no such claim of inheritance shall be recognized unless the action seeking an adjudication of paternity is filed within one (1) year after the death of the intestate or within ninety (90) days after the first publication of notice to creditors to present their claims, whichever is less; and such time period shall run notwithstanding the minority of a child. This one-year limitation shall be self-executing and may not be tolled for any reason, including lack of notice. If an administrator is appointed for the estate of the intestate and notice to creditors is given, then the limitation period shall be reduced to ninety (90) days after the first publication of notice, if less than one (1) year from the date of the intestate’s death; provided actual, written notice is given to all potential illegitimate heirs who could be located with reasonable diligence. No claim of inheritance based on an adjudication of paternity, after death of the intestate, by a court outside the State of Mississippi shall be recognized unless:

Such court was in the state of residence of the intestate at the time of the intestate’s death;

The action adjudicating paternity was filed within ninety (90) days after the death of the intestate;

All known heirs were made parties to the action; and

Paternity or legitimacy was established by clear and convincing evidence.

The natural father of an illegitimate and his kindred shall not inherit:

From or through the child unless the father has openly treated the child as his, and has not refused or neglected to support the child.

Any part of the natural mother’s estate from or through the illegitimate if the illegitimate dies unmarried and without issue, and also predeceases the natural mother. In the event of the death of an illegitimate, unmarried and without issue, any part of the illegitimate’s estate inherited from the mother shall be inherited according to the statutes of descent and distribution.

A remedy is hereby created in favor of all illegitimates having any claim existing prior to July 1, 1981, concerning the estate of an intestate whose death occurred prior to such date by or on behalf of an illegitimate or an alleged illegitimate child to inherit from or through its natural father and any claim by a natural father to inherit from or through an illegitimate child shall be brought within three (3) years from and after July 1, 1981, and such time period shall run notwithstanding the minority of a child.

The remedy created herein is separate, complete and distinct, but cumulative with the remedies afforded illegitimates as provided by the Mississippi Uniform Law on Paternity; provided, however, the failure of an illegitimate to seek or obtain relief under the Mississippi Uniform Law on Paternity shall not diminish or abate the remedy created herein.

The children of illegitimates and their descendants shall inherit from and through their mother and father according to the statutes of descent and distribution.

Nothing in this section shall preclude the establishment of paternity solely for the purpose of the illegitimate receiving social security benefits on behalf of the illegitimate’s natural father after one (1) year following the natural father’s death.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 35, art. 2 (4); 1857, ch. 60, art. 115; 1871, § 1955; 1880, § 1275; 1892, § 1549; 1906, § 1655; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1387; 1930, § 1408; 1942, § 474; Laws, 1924, ch. 162; Laws, 1981, ch. 529, § 1; Laws, 1983, ch. 339; Laws, 2005, ch. 543, § 1; Laws, 2008, ch. 388, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2008.

§ 91-1-17.
Advancement to be brought into hotchpot.

When any of the children of a person dying intestate, or their descendants, shall have received from such intestate, in his lifetime, any real or personal estate by way of advancement, and shall choose to come into the partition and distribution of the estate with the other parceners and distributees, such advancement, both of real and personal estate, shall be brought into hotchpot with the whole estate, real and personal, descended. Such party bringing such advancement into hotchpot shall thereupon be entitled to his or her proper portion of the whole estate descended, both real and personal; but such advancement shall be valued according to its value at the time said distributee received it.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 44, art. 2 (51); 1857, ch. 60, art. 113; 1871, § 1953; 1880, § 1276; 1892, § 1550; 1906, § 1656; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1388; 1930, § 1409; 1942, § 475.

§ 91-1-19.
Descent of exempt property.

The property, real and personal, exempted by law from sale under execution or attachment shall, on the death of the husband or wife owning it, descend to the survivor of them and the children and grandchildren of the decedent, as tenants in common, grandchildren inheriting their deceased parent’s share; and if there be no children or grandchildren of the decedent, to the surviving wife or husband; and if there be no such survivor, to the children and grandchildren of the deceased owner. Where the surviving husband or wife shall own a place of residence equal in value to the homestead of the decedent, and the deceased husband or wife have no surviving children or grandchildren of the last marriage but have children or grandchildren of a former marriage, the homestead of such decedent shall not descend to the surviving husband or wife, but shall descend to the surviving children and grandchildren of the decedent by such former marriage, as other property.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 49, art. 17 (2); 1857, ch. 60, art. 172; 1871, § 1956; 1880, § 1277; 1892, § 1551; 1906, § 1657; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1389; 1930, § 1410; 1942, § 476; Laws, 1900, ch. 89.

§ 91-1-21.
Exempt property liable for debt of decedent.

If there shall not be either a surviving wife or husband or children or grandchildren of the decedent, the exempt property shall be liable for the debts of the decedent and be disposed of in all respects as other property of such decedent.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1871, § 1956; 1880, § 1277; 1892, § 1552; 1906, § 1658; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1390; 1930, § 1411; 1942, § 477; Laws, 1900, ch. 89.

§ 91-1-23.
Exempt property not to be partitioned in certain cases.

Where a decedent leaves a widow to whom, with others, his exempt property, real and personal, descends, the same shall not be subject to partition or sale for partition during her widowhood as long as it is occupied or used by the widow, unless she consent. Likewise, where a decedent leaves a widower to whom, with others, her exempt property, real and personal, descends, the same shall not be subject to partition or sale for partition during the period of his being a widower as long as it is occupied or used by the widower, unless he consent.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 1553; 1906, § 1659; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1391; 1930, § 1412; 1942, § 478; Laws, 1950, ch. 346.

§ 91-1-25.
Person who has killed another not to inherit from him.

If any person wilfully cause or procure the death of another in any way, he shall not inherit the property, real or personal, of such other; but the same shall descend as if the person so causing or procuring the death had predeceased the person whose death he perpetrated.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 1554; 1906, § 1660; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1392; 1930, § 1413; 1942, § 479; Laws, 1992, ch. 311, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1992.

§ 91-1-27.
How title to property acquired by descent may be made.

In all cases in which persons have died, or may hereafter die, wholly or partially intestate, having property, real or personal, any heir at law of such deceased person, or any one interested in any of the property as to which he shall have died intestate, may petition the chancery court of the county in which said deceased had his mansion house or principal place or residence, or in which any part of his real estate may be situated, in case he was a nonresident, setting forth the fact that said person died wholly or partially intestate, possessed of real or personal property in the State of Mississippi, the names of the heirs at law or next of kin, and praying that the person named in said petition be recognized and decreed to be the heir at law of said deceased.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 2790; Hemingway’s 1917, § 310; 1930, § 359; 1942, § 1270; Laws, 1896, ch. 93.

§ 91-1-29.
Heirs to be cited to appear.

All the heirs at law and next of kin of said deceased who are not made parties plaintiff to the action shall be cited to appear and answer the same. And in addition thereto a summons by publication shall be made addressed to “The heirs at law of_______________ , Deceased,” and shall be published as other publications to absent or unknown defendants, and the cause shall be proceeded with as other causes in chancery, and upon satisfactory evidence as to death of said person and as to the fact that the parties to said suit are his sole heirs at law, the court shall enter a judgment that the persons so described be recognized as the heirs at law of such a decedent, and as such be placed in possession of his estate. And said judgment shall be evidence in all the courts of law and equity in this state that the persons therein named are the sole heirs at law of the person therein described as their ancestor.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 2791; Hemingway’s 1917, § 311; 1930, § 360; 1942, § 1271; Laws, 1991, ch. 573, § 127, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§ 91-1-31.
Judgment as to descent of property cannot be assailed collaterally except for fraud.

A judgment so rendered as provided in Section 91-1-29 shall not be assailed collaterally, except for fraud, and shall be binding and conclusive upon all persons cited to appear from the date of its rendition, and upon all persons whomsoever from and after the expiration of two (2) years from the date on which the same was rendered, saving to minors and persons of unsound mind, the right to re-open said cause within one (1) year after attaining majority or being restored to sanity. A judgment so rendered shall thereupon be filed, recorded and indexed by the chancery clerk of the county where rendered in the general deed records of said county, just as if it were a deed of conveyance from said decedent to his heirs at law. And a certified copy of such judgment may likewise be filed, recorded and indexed in any other county where the decedent owned land at the date of his death.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 2792; Hemingway’s 1917, § 312; 1930, § 361; 1942, § 1272; Laws, 1991, ch. 573, § 128, eff from and after July 1, 1991.